test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuunnjel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuuʹnnjel e-stem pöly: # Noun "Smew/uivelo"- full paradigm
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: njuuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: njuʹnnjla
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: njuʹnnjlest
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Com+Indef: njuʹnnjlin
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Ess+Indef: njuʹnnjlen
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Par+Indef: njuʹnnjled
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [njuʹnnjeltaa, njuʹnnjeltää]
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: njuʹnnjli
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: njuʹnnjlid
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: njuʹnnjlid
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: njuʹnnjlin
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Com+Indef: njuʹnnjlivuiʹm
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [njuʹnnjlitaa, njuʹnnjlitää]
